Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1262.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1626(a) and (h) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding a 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 subsection to read:Section 1626. Reporting by Candidate and Political Committees and other Persons.--(a) Each treasurer of a political committee and each candidate for election to public office shall file with the appropriate supervisor reports of receipts and expenditures on forms, designed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, if the amount received or expended or liabilities incurred shall exceed the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Should such an amount not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), then the candidate or the treasurer of the committee shall file a [sworn] statement to that effect with the appropriate supervisor rather than the report required by this section.* * *(h) All reports or statements required to be filed pursuant to this section shall be filed pursuant to [section 1630] sections 1629 and 1631.1. All reports and statements required by this section shall cover the campaign activity of a candidate only from the last prior report or statement.* * *(k) All reports or statements required to be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall be filed electronically using the electronic filing system developed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 1640(6) consistent with the purposes of this subsection. A report or statement submitted electronically must:(1) require an electronic signature from the treasurer or assistant treasurer at the time of the filing of the report or statement. In addition, a report filed by a political committee, authorized by a candidate and created solely for the purpose of 20250HB1262PN3192 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 influencing an election on behalf of that candidate must be signed, using an electronic signature, stating that, to the best of the candidate's knowledge, the political committee has not violated any provision of this act; and(2) be made subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) . Section 2. Sections 1628, 1629 heading, (a) and (b), 1630 and 1631(1) of the act are amended to read:Section 1628. Late Contributions and Independent Expenditures.--Any candidate or political committee, authorized by a candidate and created solely for the purpose of influencing an election on behalf of that candidate, which receives any contribution or pledge of five hundred dollars ($500) or more, and any person making an independent expenditure, as defined by this act, of five hundred dollars ($500) or more after the final pre-election report has been deemed completed shall report such contribution, pledge or expenditure to the appropriate supervisor. Such report shall be sent by the candidate, chairman or treasurer of the political committee within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the contribution. It shall be the duty of the supervisor to confirm the substance of such report. [The report shall be made by telegram, mailgram, overnight mail or facsimile transmission. Any] The reports filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall be filed electronically in accordance with section 1631.1. If the candidate or political committee is not required to file electronically, the report shall be filed by facsimile, electronic mail or overnight mail courier service. Except for reports required to be filed electronically, a candidate [in] on his own behalf, or chairman, treasurer or candidate [in] on behalf of the political committee 20250HB1262PN3192 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may also comply with this section by appearing personally before such supervisor and reporting such late contributions or pledges.Section 1629. [Oath of Compliance; Perjury;] Unsworn Falsification; Disqualification from Office; Commercial Use.--[(a) Each report shall be subscribed and sworn to by the individual submitting the report. In addition, any report filed by a political committee, authorized by a candidate and created solely for the purpose of influencing an election on behalf of that candidate, must be accompanied by an affidavit from that candidate which provides that, to the best of the candidate's knowledge, the political committee has not violated any provision of this act.](b) Any wilfully false, fraudulent or misleading statement or entry made by any candidate or treasurer in any statement or report [under oath] as required by this article, shall constitute the crime of [perjury] unsworn falsification to authorities, and be punishable as such according to the laws of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 1630. Residual Funds.--(a) In the event that a candidate or political committee terminates its financial activity as such, then the disbursement of any residual funds remaining in such an account shall be made in the following manner:(1) any such funds may be used for any expenditure as defined by this article; [and](2) may be returned, pro rata, to the contributors by the candidate or treasurer of the political committee[. A final report must be made by the next January 31 in accordance with 20250HB1262PN3192 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 1627.]; or(3) may be donated to a nonprofit organization.(b) A final report must be made by the next January 31 in accordance with section 1627.(c) For purposes of this section:(1) "Affiliated" means serving as an officer, on the board of directors, as a paid employee or as a contractor of a nonprofit organization.(2) "Family member" means a spouse or child.(3) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is qualified by the Internal Revenue Service as meeting the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) organized under the laws of this Commonwealth that is not affiliated with a candidate or the chairman or treasurer of a political committee, including a family member of the candidate, chairman or treasurer.(3) "NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION" MEANS AN ORGANIZATION THAT IS:(I) QUALIFIED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE AS MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF 26 U.S.C. § 501(C)(3) (RELATING TO EXEMPTION FROM TAX ON CORPORATIONS, CERTAIN TRUSTS, ETC.);(II) ORGANIZED UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH; AND(III) NOT AFFILIATED WITH A CANDIDATE OR THE CHAIRMAN OR TREASURER OF A POLITICAL COMMITTEE, INCLUDING A FAMILY MEMBER OF THE CANDIDATE, CHAIRMAN OR TREASURER.Section 1631. Place of Filing.--Any statement or report required by this article to be filed, shall be done in the following manner:(1) (i) Any candidate, individual, or committee required to file a report concerning any candidate shall file that statement 20250HB1262PN3192 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or report in the office of the supervisor with whom the candidate filed a nomination paper, nomination certificate, nomination petitions or with the supervisor with whom the candidate would have filed such if he had sought nomination in that manner.[(ii) All candidates and political committees, authorized by candidates and created solely for the purpose of influencing the election of such candidates, who must file reports with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, shall also file copies of their reports in the county in which the candidate resides.](iii) All candidates and political committees, authorized by candidates and created solely for the purpose of influencing the election of such candidates, who must file reports with the Secretary of the Commonwealth as required by this subsection, must only file reports electronically with the Secretary of the Commonwealth.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1631.1. Manner of Filing.--(a) All reports and statements required to be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth pursuant to sections 1626, 1627, 1628 and 1641 shall be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth using the electronic filing system developed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 1640(6) . (b) A report or statement filed electronically shall:(1) be made subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities);(2) include the electronic signature of the treasurer or assistant treasurer of the political committee serving at the time of the filing of the report or statement; and20250HB1262PN3192 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) for a report or statement filed by a candidate or a candidate's political committee, include the electronic signature of the candidate, stating that, to the best of the candidate's knowledge, the political committee has not violated a provision of this act.(c) (1) A candidate or political committee not able to file electronically the report or statement required by this section shall request an exemption from the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The candidate or political committee upon approval of the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall file reports and statements on forms developed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.(2) In order to request an exemption for electronic submissions or reports or statements, the candidate or political committee must demonstrate technological hardship. As used in this clause, the term "technological hardship" means a lack of computer or Internet access or a disability that prevents electronic filing.(d) (1) A principal may authorize another person to prepare the contents of the report or statement, including entry of data into the electronic filing system as required under subsection (a).(2) Each principal authorizing another to act under clause (1) must:(i) review the contents of the report or statement prepared under clause (1); and(ii) file in the electronic filing system the approval of the contents of the report or statement and verification of its accuracy, in accordance with subsection (b). The approval shall be transmitted personally by the principal and not on the 20250HB1262PN3192 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 principal's behalf by any other person.(3) No report or statement shall be considered complete or filed until all necessary approvals and verifications shall have been submitted by each principal required to file.(4) As used in this subsection, "principal" shall mean any person required to file any report or statement electronically with the Secretary of the Commonwealth in accordance with this section.Section 1631.2. Inability to File Reports or Statements Electronically by Deadline.--(a) All reports or statements filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 1631.1 are subject to the following:(1) If a candidate or political committee cannot file a report or statement on the day on which the report or statement is due because of the unavailability of the Department of State's electronic filing system under section 1640(6) at the time the candidate or political committee attempts to file the report or statement, the principal shall immediately notify the Department of State in a manner designated by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. If the Internet website is unavailable and the candidate or political committee has notified the department, the candidate or political committee shall have until 11:59 o'clock P.M. on the next day following the deadline to file the report or statement electronically and the principal shall file a statement affirming that the principal was unable to file the report or statement on time because of the unavailability of the Department of State's electronic filing system at the time the principal attempted to file the report or statement on the day the report or statement was due. The affirmation statement shall 20250HB1262PN3192 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be due at the same time as the statement or report filed under this subsection. The report or statement shall not be considered filed until the affirmation statement is filed.(2) If a candidate or political committee is unable to file as required under clause (1) because the Department of State's electronic filing system remains unavailable, the principal shall notify the Department of State each day a report or statement cannot be filed due to the unavailability of the Department of State's electronic filing system. The candidate or political committee shall have until 11:59 o'clock P.M. on the next day to electronically file the report or statement or notify the Department of State a second time of the inaccessibility of the department's electronic filing system. The principal shall file a statement affirming that the principal was unable to file the report or statement on time because of the unavailability of the Department of State's electronic filing system. The affirmation statement shall be due at the same time as the statement or report filed under this subsection. The report or statement shall not be considered filed until the affirmation statement is filed.(b) The Department of State may provide for an alternative method of electronic filing if the department's electronic filing system remains unavailable.(c) For cause shown, the Secretary of the Commonwealth may waive late filing fees for reports or statements filed after the deadline but which are the subject of notifications as prescribed by this section.(d) As used in this section, the term "unavailability of the Department of State's electronic filing system" shall mean a failure of the system within the Department of State's technical 20250HB1262PN3192 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 environment that does not allow access to the system by an individual. The term does not include:(1) a network issue between the user's computer and the Department of State's environment; or(2) a failure of any part of the user's computer or internal network.Section 4. Section 1632(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1632. Late Filing Fee; Certificate of Filing.--(a) A late filing fee for each report or statement of expenditures and contributions required to be filed with the county board of elections which is not filed within the prescribed period shall be imposed as follows. Such fee shall be ten dollars ($10) for each day or part of a day excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays that a report or statement is overdue. An additional fee of ten dollars ($10) is due for each of the first six (6) days that a report or statement is overdue. The maximum fee payable with respect to a single report or statement is two hundred fifty dollars ($250). [A supervisor] The county board of elections shall receive an overdue report or statement even if any late filing fee due has not been paid but the report or statement shall not be considered filed until all fees have been paid upon the receipt by the supervisor of an overdue report. No further late filing fees shall be incurred notwithstanding the fact that the report or statement is not considered filed. The late filing fee is the personal liability of the candidate or treasurer of a political committee and cannot be paid from contributions to the candidate or committee, nor may such fee be considered an expenditure. A report or statement of expenditures and contributions shall be deemed to 20250HB1262PN3192 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have been filed within the prescribed time if the letter transmitting the report or statement which is received by the [supervisor] county board of elections is transmitted by first class mail and is postmarked by the United States Postal Service on the day prior to the final day on which the report or statement is to be received: Provided, That this sentence shall not be applicable to the reporting requirements contained in section 1628.(a.1) For reports or statements required to be electronically filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, the penalty for each report or statement that is not filed within the prescribed period shall be twenty dollars ($20) a day for the first six (6) days the report or statement is late and one hundred dollars ($100) a day for day seven (7) and each day thereafter. The maximum penalty for late reports or statements is five hundred dollars ($500) for each required filing. The late filing fee shall be the personal responsibility of the candidate or treasurer of a political committee and cannot be paid from contributions to the candidate or committee nor may the fee be considered an expenditure. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall receive an overdue report or statement notwithstanding whether a late filing fee due has not been paid. A report or statement shall not be considered filed until all fees have been paid upon the receipt by the Secretary of the Commonwealth of an overdue report or statement.* * *Section 5. Sections 1640 and 1641(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 1640. Additional Powers and Duties of the Secretary of the Commonwealth.--(a) The Secretary of the Commonwealth 20250HB1262PN3192 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the following additional powers and duties:(1) To serve as the State clearing house for information concerning the administration of this act.(2) To prescribe suitable rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this act.(3) To develop the prescribed forms required by the provisions of this article for the making of the reports and statements required to be filed with the supervisor.(4) To prepare a manual setting forth recommended uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting which shall be furnished by the supervisor to the person required to file such reports and statements as required by this article.(5) To examine the contributions to State legislative and Statewide candidates and publish a list of all those political committees who have contributed to candidates and who have failed to file reports as required by this act within six (6) days of their failure to comply.(6) To create and maintain a searchable computer database and electronic filing system that contains the information necessary for the proper administration of this article, including information on contributions and expenditures by all candidates and all political committees and distribution of money, and including public access through the Internet. The database must be designed with an emergency recovery system to ensure that campaign expense records are not lost in the case of an emergency, natural disaster or other event that could cause the system to malfunction.(7) To establish a training program on the electronic filing system and make it available to a candidate or political committee.20250HB1262PN3192 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) To ensure that all information contained in a statement or report filed that is not on the electronic filing system be entered into the electronic filing system as soon as practicable but no later than four (4) business days after its receipt by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.(b) The Department of State shall issue to a registrant under 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 13 (relating to voter registration) an electronic receipt that includes a confirmation number and the date and time of filing.Section 1641. Reports by Business Entities; Publication by Secretary of the Commonwealth.--(a) Any business entity including but not limited to a corporation, company, association, partnership or sole proprietorship, which has been awarded non-bid contracts from the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions during the preceding calendar year, shall report electronically in accordance with section 1631.1 by February 15 of each year to the Secretary of the Commonwealth an itemized list of all political contributions known to the business entity by virtue of the knowledge possessed by every officer, director, associate, partner, limited partner or individual owner that has been made by:(1) any officer, director, associate, partner, limited partner, individual owner or members of their immediate family when the contributions exceed an aggregate of one thousand dollars ($1,000) by any individual during the preceding year; or(2) any employe or members of his immediate family whose political contribution exceeded one thousand dollars ($1,000) during the preceding year.For the purposes of this subsection, "immediate family" means a 20250HB1262PN3192 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person's spouse and any unemancipated child.* * *Section 6. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin when the electronic filing system developed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth is available for use.Section 7. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following provisions shall take effect immediately:This section.Section 6 of this act.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect 120 days after publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the notice under section 6 of this act.20250HB1262PN3192 - 14 - 123456789101112131415